Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.050

Reimbursement of expenses of directors, other school representatives, and superintendent candidates—Advancing anticipated expenses.

The actual expenses of school directors in going to, returning from and attending upon directors' meetings or other meetings called or held pursuant to statute shall be paid. Likewise, the expenses of school superintendents and other school representatives chosen by the directors to attend any conferences or meetings or to attend to any urgent business at the behest of the state superintendent of public instruction or the board of directors shall be paid. The board of directors may pay the actual and necessary expenses for travel, lodging and meals a superintendent candidate incurs when he or she attends an employment interview in the school district. The school directors, school superintendents, other school representatives or superintendent candidates may be advanced sufficient sums to cover their anticipated expenses in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the state auditor and which shall substantially conform to the procedures provided in RCW 43.03.150 through 43.03.210.

[ 1977 c 73 s 1; 1969 ex.s. c 26 s 2; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.310. Prior: 1961 c 268 s 15; prior: 1919 c 90 s 6, part; 1909 c 97 p 287 s 8, part; RRS s 4783, part. Formerly RCW 28A.58.310, 28.58.310.]